Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-518
Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

The Revised Uniform Fiduciary Access to Digital Assets Act (2015) modifies, limits, or supersedes the federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. 7001 et seq., but does not modify, limit, or supersede section 101(c) of that act, 15 U.S.C. 7001(c), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in section 103(b) of that act, 15 U.S.C. 7003(b).

Laws 2016, LB829, § 18.